incubator/apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="bokk__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gr/óv__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óva</l>
          <r>óv<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øvene</l>
          <r>óv<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øver</l>
          <r>óv<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óvi</l>
          <r>óv<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óv</l>
          <r>óv<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aug/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="E__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>E</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fredagsmorg/on__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nane</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nar</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onane</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onar</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onen</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="halvkilo__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="foreld/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eren</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="børetr/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ea</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eet</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ei</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adoptivforeldr/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="es/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elet</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gaf/fel__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>felen</l>
          <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fel</l>
          <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lane</l>
          <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lar</l>
          <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="fosterforelder"><i>fosterforeld</i><par n="foreld/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dobbeltvindauga"><i>dobbeltvindaug</i><par n="aug/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bogevindauga"><i>bogevindaug</i><par n="aug/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="husorgel"><i>husorg</i><par n="es/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gangvindauga"><i>gangvindaug</i><par n="aug/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bladøyra"><i>bladøyr</i><par n="aug/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="E"><i>E</i><par n="E__n"/></e>
    <e lm="døydsel"><i>døyds</i><par n="es/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grand"><i>grand</i><par n="bokk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="badeshorts"><i>badeshorts</i><par n="bokk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="døyingsprosent"><i>døyingsprosent</i><par n="bokk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beisel"><i>beis</i><par n="es/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="filler"><i>filler</i><par n="bokk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fråvereprosent"><i>fråvereprosent</i><par n="bokk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hjelpefengsel"><i>hjelpefengs</i><par n="es/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forelder"><i>foreld</i><par n="foreld/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hjarter"><i>hjarter</i><par n="bokk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hengeøyra"><i>hengeøyr</i><par n="aug/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dødsprosent"><i>dødsprosent</i><par n="bokk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="filttøffel"><i>filttøf</i><par n="gaf/fel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hammondorgel"><i>hammondorg</i><par n="es/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eineforelder"><i>eineforeld</i><par n="foreld/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="døingsprosent"><i>døingsprosent</i><par n="bokk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="børetre"><i>børetr</i><par n="børetr/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="griffel"><i>grif</i><par n="gaf/fel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blomkåløyra"><i>blomkåløyr</i><par n="aug/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="byrdetre"><i>byrdetr</i><par n="børetr/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gróv"><i>gr</i><par n="gr/óv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deksel"><i>deks</i><par n="es/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beksel"><i>beks</i><par n="es/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dalar"><i>dalar</i><par n="bokk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="førevarsel"><i>førevars</i><par n="es/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gongevindauga"><i>gongevindaug</i><par n="aug/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="annendagsmorgon"><i>annendagsmorg</i><par n="fredagsmorg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="åtsel"><i>åts</i><par n="es/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feittprosent"><i>feittprosent</i><par n="bokk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="halvkilo"><i>halvkilo</i><par n="halvkilo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="argusauga"><i>argusaug</i><par n="aug/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fredagsmorgon"><i>fredagsmorg</i><par n="fredagsmorg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flugeauga"><i>flugeaug</i><par n="aug/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="besteforelder"><i>besteforeld</i><par n="foreld/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beinrangel"><i>beinrang</i><par n="es/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aleineforelder"><i>aleineforeld</i><par n="foreld/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="havniauga"><i>havniaug</i><par n="aug/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feigdarvarsel"><i>feigdarvars</i><par n="es/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gaffel"><i>gaf</i><par n="gaf/fel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grisauga"><i>grisaug</i><par n="aug/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alkoholprosent"><i>alkoholprosent</i><par n="bokk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="framstøyt"><i>framstøyt</i><par n="bokk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="auga"><i>aug</i><par n="aug/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adoptivforeldre"><i>adoptivforeldr</i><par n="adoptivforeldr/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="esel"><i>es</i><par n="es/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="åleineforelder"><i>åleineforeld</i><par n="foreld/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="botsfengsel"><i>botsfengs</i><par n="es/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="høygaffel"><i>høygaf</i><par n="gaf/fel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="annandagsmorgon"><i>annandagsmorg</i><par n="fredagsmorg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bermudashorts"><i>bermudashorts</i><par n="bokk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="handorgel"><i>handorg</i><par n="es/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bøksel"><i>bøks</i><par n="es/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alsikekløver"><i>alsikekløver</i><par n="bokk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bøffel"><i>bøf</i><par n="gaf/fel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gittervindauga"><i>gittervindaug</i><par n="aug/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="butikkvindauga"><i>butikkvindaug</i><par n="aug/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="andredagsmorgon"><i>andredagsmorg</i><par n="fredagsmorg/on__n"/></e>
